North Dakota statutes. TITLE 9 Contracts And Obligations
CHAPTER 9-04 Object

9-04-01.
Definition.

The object of a contract is the thing which it is agreed on the part of the party receiving the consideration to do or not to do.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 901; R.C. 1895, § 3866; R.C. 1899, § 3866; R.C. 1905, § 5311; C.L. 1913, § 5867; R.C. 1943, § 9-0401.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1595.

9-04-02.
Requisites of object.

The object of a contract must be lawful when the contract is made and possible and ascertainable by the time the contract is to be performed. Everything is deemed possible except that which is impossible in the nature of things.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 902, 903; R.C. 1895, §§ 3867, 3868; R.C. 1899, §§ 3867, 3868; R.C. 1905, §§ 5312, 5313; C.L. 1913, §§ 5868, 5869; R.C. 1943, § 9-0402.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1596, 1597.

9-04-03.
Unlawful, impossible, or unascertainable object voids contract.

When a contract has but a single object, and such object is unlawful in whole or in part, or wholly impossible of performance, or so vaguely expressed as to be wholly unascertainable, the entire contract is void.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 904; R.C. 1895, § 3869; R.C. 1899, § 3869; R.C. 1905, § 5314; C.L. 1913, § 5870; R.C. 1943, § 9-0403.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1598.

Party to Contract.

Insurer argued that the frustration or impossibility was caused by the agent, a party to the local agent’s agreements; therefore, the district court did not err in ruling that neither doctrine applied as neither doctrine applied if the frustration or impossibility was caused by one of the contracting parties.

Huber v. Farmers Union Serv. Ass'n of N.D., 2010 ND 151, 787 N.W.2d 268, 2010 N.D. LEXIS 155 (N.D. 2010).

9-04-04.
Several objects, part unlawful, contract void.

When a contract has several distinct objects, of which one at least is lawful and one at least is unlawful in whole or in part, the contract is void as to the latter and valid as to the rest.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 905; R.C. 1895, § 3870; R.C. 1899, § 3870; R.C. 1905, § 5315; C.L. 1913, § 5871; R.C. 1943, § 9-0404.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 1599.